Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.420

Island library districts—Board of trustees—Tax levies.

Immediately following the establishment of an island library district, the board of county commissioners shall appoint a board of library trustees for the district in accordance with RCW 27.12.190. The board of trustees shall appoint a librarian for the district.

Funds for the establishment and maintenance of the library service of the district shall be provided by the board of county commissioners by means of an annual tax levy on the property in the district of not more than fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value per year. The tax levy shall be based on a budget to be compiled by the board of trustees of the island library district who shall determine the tax rate necessary and certify their determination to the board of county commissioners.

Excess levies authorized pursuant to RCW 27.12.222, 84.52.052, or 84.52.056 shall be at a rate determined by the board of trustees of the island library district and certified to the board of county commissioners.

[ 1982 c 123 s 4.]